Illinois, session 104th, HB528.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The State Revenue Sharing Act is amended by 5changing Section 0.1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 115/0.1)  (from Ch. 85, par. 610)7    Sec. 0.1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the State Revenue Sharing Act.9(Source: P.A. 91-51, eff. 6-30-99.)